Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Chapter 6. Divorce, Affirmation and Annulment.
§ 20-107.3. Court may decree as to property and debts of the parties.

Upon decreeing the dissolution of a marriage, and also upon decreeing a divorce from the bond of matrimony, or upon the filing with the court as provided in subsection J of a certified copy of a final divorce decree obtained without the Commonwealth, the court, upon request of either party, (i) shall determine the legal title as between the parties, and the ownership and value of all property, real or personal, tangible or intangible, of the parties and shall consider which of such property is separate property, which is marital property, and which is part separate and part marital property in accordance with subdivision 3 and (ii) shall determine the nature of all debts of the parties, or either of them, and shall consider which of such debts is separate debt and which is marital debt. The court shall determine the value of any such property as of the date of the evidentiary hearing on the evaluation issue. The court shall determine the amount of any such debt as of the date of the last separation of the parties, if at such time or thereafter at least one of the parties intends that the separation be permanent, and the extent to which such debt has increased or decreased from the date of separation until the date of the evidentiary hearing. Upon motion of either party made no less than 21 days before the evidentiary hearing the court may, for good cause shown, in order to attain the ends of justice, order that a different valuation date be used. The court, on the motion of either party, may retain jurisdiction in the final decree of divorce to adjudicate the remedy provided by this section when the court determines that such action is clearly necessary, and all decrees heretofore entered retaining such jurisdiction are validated.

Separate property is (i) all property, real and personal, acquired by either party before the marriage; (ii) all property acquired during the marriage by bequest, devise, descent, survivorship or gift from a source other than the other party; (iii) all property acquired during the marriage in exchange for or from the proceeds of sale of separate property, provided that such property acquired during the marriage is maintained as separate property; and (iv) that part of any property classified as separate pursuant to subdivision 3. Income received from separate property during the marriage is separate property if not attributable to the personal effort of either party. The increase in value of separate property during the marriage is separate property, unless marital property or the personal efforts of either party have contributed to such increases and then only to the extent of the increases in value attributable to such contributions. The personal efforts of either party must be significant and result in substantial appreciation of the separate property if any increase in value attributable thereto is to be considered marital property.

Marital property is (i) all property titled in the names of both parties, whether as joint tenants, tenants by the entirety or otherwise, except as provided by subdivision 3, (ii) that part of any property classified as marital pursuant to subdivision 3, or (iii) all other property acquired by each party during the marriage which is not separate property as defined above. All property including that portion of pensions, profit-sharing or deferred compensation or retirement plans of whatever nature, acquired by either spouse during the marriage, and before the last separation of the parties, if at such time or thereafter at least one of the parties intends that the separation be permanent, is presumed to be marital property in the absence of satisfactory evidence that it is separate property. For purposes of this section marital property is presumed to be jointly owned unless there is a deed, title or other clear indicia that it is not jointly owned.

The court shall classify property as part marital property and part separate property as follows:

In the case of income received from separate property during the marriage, such income shall be marital property only to the extent it is attributable to the personal efforts of either party. In the case of the increase in value of separate property during the marriage, such increase in value shall be marital property only to the extent that marital property or the personal efforts of either party have contributed to such increases, provided that any such personal efforts must be significant and result in substantial appreciation of the separate property.

In the case of any pension, profit-sharing, or deferred compensation plan or retirement benefit, the marital share as defined in subsection G shall be marital property.

In the case of any personal injury or workers' compensation recovery of either party, the marital share as defined in subsection H shall be marital property.

When marital property and separate property are commingled by contributing one category of property to another, resulting in the loss of identity of the contributed property, the classification of the contributed property shall be transmuted to the category of property receiving the contribution. However, to the extent the contributed property is retraceable by a preponderance of the evidence and was not a gift, such contributed property shall retain its original classification.

When marital property and separate property are commingled into newly acquired property resulting in the loss of identity of the contributing properties, the commingled property shall be deemed transmuted to marital property. However, to the extent the contributed property is retraceable by a preponderance of the evidence and was not a gift, the contributed property shall retain its original classification.

When separate property is retitled in the joint names of the parties, the retitled property shall be deemed transmuted to marital property. However, to the extent the property is retraceable by a preponderance of the evidence and was not a gift, the retitled property shall retain its original classification.

When the separate property of one party is commingled into the separate property of the other party, or the separate property of each party is commingled into newly acquired property, to the extent the contributed property is retraceable by a preponderance of the evidence and was not a gift, each party shall be reimbursed the value of the contributed property in any award made pursuant to this section.

Subdivisions 3 d, e and f shall apply to jointly owned property. No presumption of gift shall arise under this section where (i) separate property is commingled with jointly owned property; (ii) newly acquired property is conveyed into joint ownership; or (iii) existing property is conveyed or retitled into joint ownership. For purposes of this subdivision 3, property is jointly owned when it is titled in the name of both parties, whether as joint tenants, tenants by the entireties, or otherwise.

Separate debt is (i) all debt incurred by either party before the marriage, (ii) all debt incurred by either party after the date of the last separation of the parties, if at such time or thereafter at least one of the parties intends that the separation be permanent, and (iii) that part of any debt classified as separate pursuant to subdivision 5. However, to the extent that a party can show by a preponderance of the evidence that the debt was incurred for the benefit of the marriage or family, the court may designate the debt as marital.

Marital debt is (i) all debt incurred in the joint names of the parties before the date of the last separation of the parties, if at such time or thereafter at least one of the parties intends that the separation be permanent, whether incurred before or after the date of the marriage, and (ii) all debt incurred in either party's name after the date of the marriage and before the date of the last separation of the parties, if at such time or thereafter at least one of the parties intends that the separation be permanent. However, to the extent that a party can show by a preponderance of the evidence that the debt, or a portion thereof, was incurred, or the proceeds secured by incurring the debt were used, in whole or in part, for a nonmarital purpose, the court may designate the entire debt as separate or a portion of the debt as marital and a portion of the debt as separate.

For the purposes of this section only, both parties shall be deemed to have rights and interests in the marital property. However, such interests and rights shall not attach to the legal title of such property and are only to be used as a consideration in determining a monetary award, if any, as provided in this section.

Except as provided in subsection G, the court shall have no authority to order the division or transfer of separate property or marital property, or separate or marital debt, which is not jointly owned or owed. However, upon a finding that separate property of one party is in the possession or control of the other party, the court may order that the property be transferred to the party whose separate property it is. The court may, based upon the factors listed in subsection E, divide or transfer or order the division or transfer, or both, of jointly owned marital property, jointly owed marital debt, or any part thereof. The court shall also have the authority to apportion and order the payment of the debts of the parties, or either of them, that are incurred prior to the dissolution of the marriage, based upon the factors listed in subsection E.

In addition, based upon (i) the equities and the rights and interests of each party in the marital property, and (ii) the factors listed in subsection E, the court has the power to grant a monetary award, payable either in a lump sum or over a period of time in fixed amounts, to either party. The party against whom a monetary award is made may satisfy the award, in whole or in part, by conveyance of property, subject to the approval of the court. An award entered pursuant to this subsection shall constitute a judgment within the meaning of § 8.01-426 and shall not be docketed by the clerk unless the decree so directs. An award entered pursuant to this subsection may be enforceable in the same manner as any other money judgment. The provisions of § 8.01-382, relating to interest on judgments, shall apply unless the court orders otherwise.

The amount of any division or transfer of jointly owned marital property, and the amount of any monetary award, the apportionment of marital debts, and the method of payment shall be determined by the court after consideration of the following factors:

The contributions, monetary and nonmonetary, of each party to the well-being of the family;

The contributions, monetary and nonmonetary, of each party in the acquisition and care and maintenance of such marital property of the parties;

The duration of the marriage;

The ages and physical and mental condition of the parties;

The circumstances and factors which contributed to the dissolution of the marriage, specifically including any ground for divorce under the provisions of subdivision A (1), (3) or (6) of § 20-91 or § 20-95;

How and when specific items of such marital property were acquired;

The debts and liabilities of each spouse, the basis for such debts and liabilities, and the property which may serve as security for such debts and liabilities;

The liquid or nonliquid character of all marital property;

The tax consequences to each party;

The use or expenditure of marital property by either of the parties for a nonmarital separate purpose or the dissipation of such funds, when such was done in anticipation of divorce or separation or after the last separation of the parties; and

Such other factors as the court deems necessary or appropriate to consider in order to arrive at a fair and equitable monetary award.

The court shall determine the amount of any such monetary award without regard to maintenance and support awarded for either party or support for the minor children of both parties and shall, after or at the time of such determination and upon motion of either party, consider whether an order for support and maintenance of a spouse or children shall be entered or, if previously entered, whether such order shall be modified or vacated.

In addition to the monetary award made pursuant to subsection D, and upon consideration of the factors set forth in subsection E:

The court may direct payment of a percentage of the marital share of any pension, profit-sharing or deferred compensation plan or retirement benefits, whether vested or nonvested, which constitutes marital property and whether payable in a lump sum or over a period of time. The court may order direct payment of such percentage of the marital share by direct assignment to a party from the employer trustee, plan administrator or other holder of the benefits. However, the court shall only direct that payment be made as such benefits are payable. No such payment shall exceed 50 percent of the marital share of the cash benefits actually received by the party against whom such award is made. "Marital share" means that portion of the total interest, the right to which was earned during the marriage and before the last separation of the parties, if at such time or thereafter at least one of the parties intended that the separation be permanent. Any determination of military retirement benefits shall be in accordance with the federal Uniformed Services Former Spouses' Protection Act (10 U.S.C. 1408 et seq.).

To the extent permitted by federal or other applicable law, the court may order a party to designate a spouse or former spouse as irrevocable beneficiary during the lifetime of the beneficiary of all or a portion of any survivor benefit or annuity plan of whatsoever nature, but not to include a life insurance policy except to the extent permitted by § 20-107.1:1. The court, in its discretion, shall determine as between the parties, who shall bear the costs of maintaining such plan.

In addition to the monetary award made pursuant to subsection D, and upon consideration of the factors set forth in subsection E, the court may direct payment of a percentage of the marital share of any personal injury or workers' compensation recovery of either party, whether such recovery is payable in a lump sum or over a period of time. However, the court shall only direct that payment be made as such recovery is payable, whether by settlement, jury award, court award, or otherwise. "Marital share" means that part of the total personal injury or workers' compensation recovery attributable to lost wages or medical expenses to the extent not covered by health insurance accruing during the marriage and before the last separation of the parties, if at such time or thereafter at least one of the parties intended that the separation be permanent.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the affirmation, ratification and incorporation in a decree of an agreement between the parties pursuant to §§ 20-109 and 20-109.1. Agreements, otherwise valid as contracts, entered into between spouses prior to the marriage shall be recognized and enforceable.

A court of proper jurisdiction under § 20-96 may exercise the powers conferred by this section after a court of a foreign jurisdiction has decreed a dissolution of a marriage or a divorce from the bond of matrimony, if (i) one of the parties was domiciled in this Commonwealth when the foreign proceedings were commenced, (ii) the foreign court did not have personal jurisdiction over the party domiciled in the Commonwealth, (iii) the proceeding is initiated within two years of receipt of notice of the foreign decree by the party domiciled in the Commonwealth, and (iv) the court obtains personal jurisdiction over the parties pursuant to subdivision A 9 of § 8.01-328.1, or in any other manner permitted by law.

The court shall have the continuing authority and jurisdiction to make any additional orders necessary to effectuate and enforce any order entered pursuant to this section, including the authority to:

Order a date certain for transfer or division of any jointly owned property under subsection C or payment of any monetary award under subsection D;

Punish as contempt of court any willful failure of a party to comply with the provisions of any order made by the court under this section;

Appoint a special commissioner to transfer any property under subsection C where a party refuses to comply with the order of the court to transfer such property; and

Modify any order entered in a case filed on or after July 1, 1982, intended to affect or divide any pension, profit-sharing or deferred compensation plan or retirement benefits pursuant to the United States Internal Revenue Code or other applicable federal laws, only for the purpose of establishing or maintaining the order as a qualified domestic relations order or to revise or conform its terms so as to effectuate the expressed intent of the order.

If it appears upon or after the entry of a final decree of divorce from the bond of matrimony that neither party resides in the city or county of the circuit court that entered the decree, the court may, on the motion of any party or on its own motion, transfer to the circuit court for the city or county where either party resides the authority to make additional orders pursuant to subsection K or to carry out or enforce any stipulation, contract, or agreement between the parties that has been affirmed, ratified, and incorporated by reference pursuant to § 20-109.1.

For purposes of this subdivision, the nonowning spouse shall bear the burden of proving that (i) contributions of marital property or personal effort were made and (ii) the separate property increased in value. Once this burden of proof is met, the owning spouse shall bear the burden of proving that the increase in value or some portion thereof was not caused by contributions of marital property or personal effort.

"Personal effort" of a party shall be deemed to be labor, effort, inventiveness, physical or intellectual skill, creativity, or managerial, promotional or marketing activity applied directly to the separate property of either party.

As a means of dividing or transferring the jointly owned marital property, the court may transfer or order the transfer of real or personal property or any interest therein to one of the parties, permit either party to purchase the interest of the other and direct the allocation of the proceeds, provided the party purchasing the interest of the other agrees to assume any indebtedness secured by the property, or order its sale by private sale by the parties, through such agent as the court shall direct, or by public sale as the court shall direct without the necessity for partition. All decrees entered prior to July 1, 1991, which are final and not subject to further proceedings on appeal as of that date, which divide or transfer or order the division or transfer of property directly between the parties are hereby validated and deemed self-executing. All orders or decrees which divide or transfer or order division or transfer of real property between the parties shall be recorded and indexed in the names of the parties in the appropriate grantor and grantee indexes in the land records in the clerk's office of the circuit court of the county or city in which the property is located.

Any marital property, which has been considered or ordered transferred in granting the monetary award under this section, shall not thereafter be the subject of a suit between the same parties to transfer title or possession of such property.

(1982, c. 309; 1984, c. 649; 1985, cc. 4, 442; 1986, cc. 533, 537; 1988, cc. 745, 746, 747, 825, 880; 1989, c. 70; 1990, cc. 636, 764; 1991, cc. 632, 640, 698; 1992, c. 88; 1993, c. 79; 2004, cc. 654, 757; 2006, c. 260; 2010, c. 506; 2011, c. 655; 2012, c. 144; 2016, c. 559; 2017, c. 797; 2019, c. 304.)

Cross references.

- As to effect of divorce on multiple party accounts, see

§

6.2-607.

As to court allowing one expert witness for each party to remain in the courtroom in cases pertaining to distribution of marital property under this section, see

§

8.01-375.

As to provision that a decree, etc., for support and maintenance of a spouse or of infant children payable in future installments or a monetary award for future installments as provided for in

§

20-107.3 shall be a lien upon such real estate of the obligor as the court shall, from time to time, designate by order or decree, see

§

8.01-460.

Editor's note.

- Acts 1990, c. 636, cl. 2 and c. 764, cl. 2, provided: "That the provisions of this act shall apply only to suits filed after July 1, 1990."

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, "only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth." The funding was not provided.

At the direction of the Code Commission, in subdivision E 5, substituted "subdivision A (1), (3) or (6) of
§
20-91" for "subdivision (1), (3) or (6) of

§

20-91."

The 2004 amendments.

- The 2004 amendments by cc. 654 and 757 are nearly identical and substituted "21 days" for "twenty-one days" in subsection A; inserted present subdivision E 10; redesignated former subdivision E 10 as subdivision E 11 and made a related change; and substituted "50" for "fifty" in subdivision G 1.

The 2006 amendments.

- The 2006 amendment by c. 260 inserted subdivision A 3 g and redesignated former subdivision A 3 g as subdivision A 3 h.

The 2010 amendments.

- The 2010 amendment by c. 506 inserted the next-to-last sentence in the first paragraph of subsection D.

The 2011 amendments.

- The 2011 amendment by c. 655, in the first paragraph in subsection A, in the first sentence, added the clause (i) designation and clause (ii), and added the third sentence; added subdivisions A 4 and A 5; and in the first paragraph in subsection C, in the first sentence, inserted "or separate or marital debt" and added "or owed," and in the second sentence, inserted "jointly owed marital debt."

The 2012 amendments.

- The 2012 amendment by c. 144 deleted "of this section" following "subsection H" in subdivision A 3 c; deleted "of this section" following "Subdivisions A 3 d, e and f" in the first sentence of subdivision A 3 h; and added subsection L.

The 2016 amendments.

- The 2016 amendment by c. 559, in subsection C, inserted "However, upon a finding that separate property of one party is in the possession or control of the other party, the court may order that the property be transferred to the party whose separate property it is."

The 2017 amendments.

- The 2017 amendment by c. 797, in subdivision G 2, inserted "except to the extent permitted by
§
20-107.1:1."

The 2019 amendments.

- The 2019 amendment by c. 304 added the last sentence in subdivision G 1; and made stylistic changes.

Law review.

- As to 1988 legislative changes in equitable distribution, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 565 (1988). For article, "The Subject Matter Jurisdiction of Virginia Courts in Divorce and Equitable Distribution Proceedings," see 11 G.M.U. L. Rev. 73 (1989). For survey on domestic relations in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989). For article, "Virginia's Equitable Distribution Law: An Owner's Manual," see 46 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 807 (1989).

For survey of Virginia property law for the year 1989-1990, see 24 U. Rich. L. Rev. 725 (1990).

For comment, "Virginia's Equitable Distribution Law: Active Appreciation and the Source of Funds Rule," see 47 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 879 (1990).

For an article, "Domestic Relations," see 31 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1069 (1997).

For an article, "A Dead Language:
Divorce Law and Practice Before No-Fault," see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1497 (2000).

For article, "Gender Bias Task Force: Comments on Family Law Issues," see 58 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1089 (2001).

For article surveying developments in family law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 155 (2002).

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

For 2006 survey article, "Family and Juvenile Law," see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

For 2006 survey article, "Wills, Trusts, and Estates," see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (2006).

For 2007 annual survey article, "Family and Juvenile Law," see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 417 (2007).

For essay, "Bifurcation of Civil Trials," see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2010).

For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 145 (2011).

For annual survey article, see "Family Law," 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 135 (2013).

For essay, "The Court of Appeals of Virginia Celebrates Thirty Years of Service to the Commonwealth," see 50 U. Rich. L. Rev. 217 (2015).

Research References.

- Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 11 Trials at Common Law.
§
11.05 Motions at Trial. Bryson.

Family Law and Practice (Matthew Bender). Rutkin.

Family Law Litigation Guide with Forms: Discovery, Evidence, Trial Practice (Matthew Bender).

Valuation and Distribution of Marital Property (Matthew Bender). Rutkin, Troyan, and Blumberg.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender).
No. 2-1007 Scheduling Order for Divorce Trial.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
35, 37, 40, 49, 50, 52, 53, 60, 63, 64, 65, 68, 72, 79; 6B M.J. Dower,

§

48; 9B M.J. Husband and Wife,

§

75.

§ 20-108. Revision and alteration of such decrees.

The court may, from time to time after decreeing as provided in § 20-107.2, on petition of either of the parents, or on its own motion or upon petition of any probation officer or the Department of Social Services, which petition shall set forth the reasons for the relief sought, revise and alter such decree concerning the care, custody, and maintenance of the children and make a new decree concerning the same, as the circumstances of the parents and the benefit of the children may require. The intentional withholding of visitation of a child from the other parent without just cause may constitute a material change of circumstances justifying a change of custody in the discretion of the court.

No support order may be retroactively modified, but may be modified with respect to any period during which there is a pending petition for modification in any court, but only from the date that notice of such petition has been given to the responding party.

Any member of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, National Guard, or any other reserve component thereof, who files a petition or is a party to a petition requesting the adjudication of the custody, visitation or support of a child based on a change of circumstances due to one of the parent's deployment, as that term is defined in § 20-124.7, shall be entitled to have such a petition expedited on the docket of the court.

(Code 1919, § 5111; 1926, p. 105; 1927, p. 184; 1934, p. 515; 1938, p. 784; 1944, p. 397; 1948, p. 593; 1986, c. 537; 1987, c. 649; 1991, c. 438; 2002, c. 747; 2004, c. 204; 2006, c. 371; 2011, c. 351.)

Cross references.

- As to provision that a decree, etc., for support and maintenance of a spouse or of infant children payable in future installments or a monetary award for future installments as provided for in

§

20-107.3 shall be a lien upon such real estate of the obligor as the court shall, from time to time, designate by order or decree, see

§

8.01-460.

The 2002 amendments.

- The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, substituted "the Department of Social Services" for "superintendent of public welfare" in the first sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

- The 2004 amendment by c. 204 inserted "in any court" in the last paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

- The 2006 amendment by c. 371 added the last paragraph.

The 2011 amendments.

- The 2011 amendment by c. 351 substituted "Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, National Guard, or any other reserve component thereof, who files a petition or is a party to a petition requesting the adjudication of the custody, visitation or support of a child based on a change of circumstances due to one of the parent's deployment, as that term is defined in
§
20-124.7" for "Armed Forces Reserves, Virginia National Guard, or Virginia National Guard Reserves, who files a petition or is a party to a petition requesting the adjudication of the custody, visitation or support of a child based on a change of circumstances because one of the parents has been called to active duty" in the third paragraph.

Law review.

- For comment, "Lack of Due Process in Virginia Contempt Proceeding for Failure to Comply with Order for Support and Alimony," see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 128 (1969). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1431 (1976). For comment, "The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act in Virginia," see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (1979). For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981). For article on modification of agreement-based custody decrees, see 68 Va. L. Rev. 1263 (1982). For comment, "The Enforceability of Arbitration Clauses in Virginia Marital Separation Agreements," see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. 333 (1985). For article, "The Search for Guidance in Determining the Best Interests of the Child at Divorce: Reconciling the Primary Caretaker and Joint Custody Preferences," see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (1985). For note, "Homosexuality and the Custodial Parent in Virginia - The Effects of Roe v. Roe," see 8 Geo. Mason U.L. Rev. 389 (1986).

For article, "Legal Issues Involving Children," see 26 U. Rich. L. Rev. 797 (1992).

For 2006 survey article, "Family and Juvenile Law," see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 135 (2013).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
35, 46, 53, 57, 58, 58.2, 79.